src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
!! Adjective inflection
!! Khanty

LEXICON Adj-rusked
 AdjTag ;

LEXICON AdjTag ! beginning 
+A: SGNOMSUF ;
+A: SGGENSUF ;
+A: SGACCSUF ;
+A: SGPARTSUF ;
+A: SGTRASUF ;
+A: SGABESUF ;
+A: SGCOMSUF ;
+A: SGINESUF ;
+A: SGILLSUF ;
+A: SGADESUF ;
+A: SGABlSUF ;
+A: SGALLSUF ;
+A: SGESSSUF ;
+A: SGPRLSUF ;
+A: SGAPR1SUF ;
+A: SGAPR2SUF ;
+A: SGEGRSUF ;
+A: SGTER1SUF ;
+A: SGTER2SUF ;
+A: SGADD1SUF ;
+A: SGADD2SUF ;

+A: PLNOMSUF ;
+A: PLGENSUF ;
+A: PLACCSUF ;
+A: PLPARTSUF ;
+A: PLTRASUF ;
+A: PLABESUF ;
+A: PLCOMSUF ;
+A: PLINESUF ;
+A: PLILLSUF ;
+A: PLADESUF ;
+A: PLABlSUF ;
+A: PLALLSUF ;
+A: PLESSSUF ;
+A: PLPRLSUF ;
+A: PLAPR1SUF ;
+A: PLAPR2SUF ;
+A: PLEGRSUF ;
+A: PLTER1SUF ;
+A: PLTER2SUF ;
+A: PLADD1SUF ;
+A: PLADD2SUF ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
